Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.205

Control of noxious weeds in open areas.

Open areas subject to the spread of noxious weeds, including but not limited to subdivisions, school grounds, playgrounds, parks, and rights-of-way shall be subject to regulation in the same manner and to the same extent as is provided for all terrestrial and aquatic lands of the state.

[ 2021 c 217 s 10; 1997 c 353 s 24; 1975 1st ex.s. c 13 s 16.]